Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.170

Judgment for penalty or forfeiture—Effect of collusion.

A recovery of a judgment for a penalty or forfeiture by collusion between the plaintiff and defendant, with intent to save the defendant wholly or partially from the consequences contemplated by law, in case when the penalty or forfeiture is given wholly or partly to the person who prosecutes, shall not bar the recovery of the same by another person.

[Code 1881 s 659; 1869 p 153 s 599; RRS s 965.]